tables/en-us-g1.ctb
# liblouis: English, U.S. grade 1 (EBAE) table
#
# -----------
#-name: U.S. English grade 1 (EBAE)
#-index-name: English, U.S., uncontracted
#-display-name: English uncontracted braille as used in the U.S.
#
#+locale:en-US
#+type:literary
#+contraction:no
#+grade:1
#+system:ebae
#
# TODO: Please correct the metadata above. It is not meant to be
# accurate nor complete. It hasn't been verified by the table
# author yet. It is merely an attempt by the liblouis maintainers
# to get some sensible initial values in place.
#
# TODO: Please add a reference to official documentation about
# the implemented braille code. Preferably submit the documents
# to https://github.com/liblouis/braille-specs.
# -----------
#
#  Based on the Linux screenreader BRLTTY, copyright (C) 1999-2006 by
#  The BRLTTY Team
#
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2006 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2004-2006 JJB Software, Inc. www.jjb-software.com
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

include en-chardefs.cti All character definition opcodes
include en-us-compbrl.uti Comp6 translation  opcodes

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand
letsign 56
noletsignafter .
noletsignafter '
#capsletter 6
#capsword 6-6
#endcapsword 6-3
capsletter 6
begcapsword 6-6
endcapsword 6-3

emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold
emphclass transnote

begemphword italic 46-3
endemphword italic 46-36
emphletter italic 46-25

begemphphrase bold 456-46-46
endemphphrase bold before 456-46
lenemphphrase bold 4
begemphword bold 456-46

begemphword underline 456-36
endemphword underline 3-6
lenemphphrase underline 3
begemphphrase underline 456-2356
endemphphrase underline after 6-3

begemph transnote 6-3
endemph transnote 6-3

begcomp 456-346
endcomp 456-156

# literary forms of the decimal digits
include litdigits6Dots.uti

# display/passthrough for unicode braille
include braille-patterns.cti

# Letters are defined in chardefs.cti

# punctuation
prepunc ( 2356
word ( 4-2356
noback always ( 2356
postpunc ) 2356
word ) 4-2356
noback always ) 2356
prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
word " 4-236
prepunc ` 6-236
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 356-3
word ' 4-3
word 'em = 
word 'tis =
word 'twas =
begnum # 456-1456 print number sign before number
midnum , 2
postpunc , 2
word , 4-2
decpoint . 46
midnum - 36
hyphen - 36
always \s--\s 36-36
always \s-\s 36-36
midnum \x00ad 36
postpunc . 256
word . 4-256
postpunc ; 23
word ; 4-23
midnum : 25
postpunc : 25
always : 4-25
postpunc ! 235
always ! 4-235
midnum / 34
always / 456-34
always < 5-13
always = 46-13
always > 46-2
always + 4-346
postpunc ? 236
endword s' 234-3
word ? 4-236
endnum st 34
endnum nd 1345-145
endnum rd 1235-145
noback endnum 's 3-234
endnum th 1456
endnum 's 3-234
always % 4-25-1234
midnum ^ 45
always ^ 456-126
always ~ 4-156
always & 4-12346
midnum * 4-16
always * 35-35
prepunc [ 6-2356
word [ 4-6-2356
always [ 6-2356
postpunc ] 2356-3
word ] 4-2356-3
always ] 2356-3
prepunc { 56-2356
word { 4-56-2356
always { 56-2356
postpunc } 2356-23
word } 4-2356-23
always } 2356-23
always @ 4-1
always \\ 4-1256
always | 456-1256
always \s-\s 36-36
always ..." 3-3-3-356
always ... 3-3-3
always ...' 3-3-3-356-3
repeated .... 0
repeated ____ 456
#repeated ---- 36  Removed, causes truncation of HTML separators
always .\s.\s." 3-3-3-356
always .\s.\s. 3-3-3 . . .
begnum $ 256
nofor begnum $ 256-3456
always $ 4-256

# special character sequences
# Some of the following compbrl entries are commented out
# so that filenames may be consistently presented as fully translated strings in shell folder listviews:
compbrl :// URLs
compbrl ()
compbrl www.
compbrl ::
# compbrl .com
# compbrl .edu
# compbrl .gov
# compbrl .ini
# compbrl .mil
# compbrl .net
# compbrl .org
# compbrl .doc
# compbrl .xml
# compbrl .xsl
# compbrl .htm
# compbrl .html
# compbrl .tex
# compbrl .txt
# compbrl .gif
# compbrl .jpg
# compbrl .png
# compbrl .wav
# compbrl .tar
# compbrl .zip

noback context "\e"$a *
noback always \\_ 56 letter sign before Roman page numbers
noback pass2 @56-56 @56
noback pass2 @3-56 @3

# Show undefined characters 
undefined 12345678
